Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5597.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12. (1) An Unless inspections are performed by a third-party inspection company under section 12a, an enforcing agency shall periodically inspect all construction undertaken pursuant to in accordance with a building permit issued by it the enforcing agency to insure ensure that the construction is performed in accordance with conditions of the building permit and is consistent with requirements of the code and other applicable laws and ordinances. (2) The owner of premises on which a building or structure is being constructed is deemed considered to have consented to inspection by the enforcing agency and the commission of the entire premises and of any construction being performed on it the premises until a certificate of use and occupancy has been issued. An inspector, or team of inspectors, on presentation of proper credentials, may enter and inspect the premises and construction thereon, on the premises, for purposes of insuring ensuring compliance with the building permit, the code, and other applicable laws and regulations. An inspection shall must be made between 8 a.m. and 6 p.m. on business days, or when construction is actually being undertaken, except if the enforcing agency has probable cause to believe that an immediate danger to life, limb, or property exists, or except with permission of an owner, or his the owner's agent, architect, engineer, or builder. An inspection pursuant to under this section shall must be solely for purposes of enforcing this act and other laws and ordinances related to construction of buildings and structures. A person other than the owner, his or the owner's agent, architect, engineer, or builder shall not accompany an inspector or team of inspectors on an inspection, unless his the person's presence is necessary for the enforcement of this act, or other laws and ordinances related to construction of the building or structure, or except with the consent of an owner, or his the owner's agent, architect, engineer, or builder. (3) If construction is being undertaken contrary to a building permit, this act, or other applicable laws or ordinances, the enforcing agency shall give written notice to the holder of the building permit, or if a permit has not been issued then to the person doing the construction, notifying him of the violation of this act, or other applicable laws and ordinances, and to appear and show cause why the construction should not be stopped. If the person doing the construction is not known, or cannot be located with reasonable effort, the notice may be delivered to the person in charge of, or apparently in charge of, the construction. If the holder of the permit or the person doing the construction fails to appear and show good cause within 1 full working day after notice is delivered, the enforcing agency shall cause a written order to stop construction to be posted on the premises. A person shall not continue, or cause or allow to be continued, construction in violation of a stop construction order, except with permission of the enforcing agency to abate the dangerous condition or remove the violation, or except by court order. If an order to stop construction is not obeyed, the enforcing agency may apply to the circuit court for the county in which the premises are located for an order enjoining the violation of the stop construction order. This remedy is in addition to, and not in limitation of, any other remedy provided by law or ordinance, and does not prevent criminal prosecution for failure to obey the order. (4) Without limitation on other available remedies, an interested person may apply for an order , enjoining to enjoin the continuation of construction undertaken in violation of a building permit, this act, the code, or other applicable laws or ordinances, to the circuit court for the county in which the premises are located. Sec. 12a. (1) An owner of a building or structure that is subject to a building permit issued under this act, or the owner's agent, may contract with a third-party inspection company to perform an inspection or test under subsection (2) of the building or structure. (2) A third-party inspection company described in subsection (1) may perform an inspection or test of the building or structure, if both of the following conditions are met: (a) The company performs the inspection or test in accordance with the requirements of this act, the code, or any other law or ordinance to determine whether the building or structure is compliant with this act, the code, or any other law or ordinance. (b) Any personnel the company assigns to perform the inspection or test is registered as an inspector under article 10 of the skilled trades regulation act, MCL 339.6001 to 339.6023, and the company provides documentation of the registration to the enforcing agency on request. (3) A third-party inspection company that performs an inspection or test under subsection (2) shall keep compliance documentation and records of the inspection or test as required by this act, the code, or any other law or ordinance. (4) Upon the completion of an inspection or test under this section, a third-party inspection company shall submit a report of the inspection or test to the enforcing agency and to the owner of the building or structure, or the owner's agent. The report must include all of the following: (a) The company's compliance determination for the building or structure and documentation of the inspection or test that the company performed under subsection (2). The company's compliance determination must be based on the conditions of the applicable building permit. (b) Notice of any necessary correction of a discrepancy that the company found in the inspection or test that must be made before a certificate of use and occupancy may be issued under section 13. (c) Notification of any potential conflicts of interest the company has relative to other persons that perform construction in this state. (d) A copy of the building official registration of the individual who performed the inspection or test under subsection (2). (5) An enforcing agency that receives an inspection or test report from a third-party inspection company under subsection (4) that is to the satisfaction of the enforcing agency may issue a certificate of use and occupancy under section 13. Sec. 13. A new building or structure hereafter constructed shall must not be used or occupied in whole or in part until a certificate of use and occupancy has been issued by the appropriate enforcing agency. A building or structure hereafter that is altered in whole or in part shall must not be used or occupied until such a certificate of use and occupancy has been issued, except that a use or occupancy in an already existing building or structure that was not discontinued during its alteration may be continued for 30 days after completion of the alteration without issuance of a certificate of use and occupancy. A The enforcing agency shall issue a certificate of use and occupancy shall be issued by the enforcing agency when the work covered by a building permit has been completed in accordance with the permit, the code, and other applicable laws and ordinances. On request of a holder of a building permit, the enforcing agency may issue a temporary certificate of use and occupancy for a building or structure, or part thereof, of the building or structure, before the entire work covered by the building permit has been completed, if the parts of the building or structure to be covered by the certificate may be occupied before completion of all the work in accordance with the permit, the code and other applicable laws and ordinances, without endangering the health or safety of the occupants or users. When If a building or structure is entitled thereto, to a certificate of use and occupancy, the enforcing agency shall issue a certificate of use and occupancy within not more than 5 business days after receipt of a written application therefor for the certificate on a form to be prescribed by the enforcing agency and payment of the fee to be established by it. The certificate of use and occupancy shall must certify that the building or structure has been constructed in accordance with the building permit, the code, and other applicable laws and ordinances. The application for a certificate of use and occupancy for a new dwelling with a unit or units for rent shall must set forth the information required in an application for a certificate of compliance for such a dwelling pursuant to under the state housing law, and the certificate of use and occupancy for such a dwelling shall must be deemed its initial certificate of compliance. The Unless the final inspection is performed by a third-party inspection company under section 12a, an enforcing agency shall give the owner of the building or structure or his the owner's agent at least not less than 12 hours' notice of the time of any final inspection, by the enforcing agency of the work covered by the building permit, pursuant to in accordance with the application for a certificate of use and occupancy.